Washington statutes.
RCW 12.36.055

Trial of an appeal from small claims judgment.

(1) The appeal from a small claims judgment or decision shall be de novo upon the record of the case, as entered by the district court.

(2) Any cases heard in superior court pursuant to this section may be heard by a duly appointed commissioner. As used in this chapter "judge" includes any duly appointed commissioner.

[ 2001 c 156 s 2; 1997 c 352 s 11.]